Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE A. PERMITS

CHAPTER 56. WATER PARK PERMIT

Sec. 56.01. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the holder of two or more water park permits may deliver alcoholic beverages from any premises for which one of those permits has been issued to any other premises for which one of those permits has been issued.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 32 (S.B. 1176), Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 2017.

Sec. 56.02. QUALIFICATIONS FOR PERMIT; ELIGIBLE PREMISES. (a) A water park permit may be issued only to a person who:

(1) holds a wine and malt beverage retailer's permit under Chapter 25; and

(2) operates a public venue that:

(A) involves waterslides, food service, music, and amusement activities; and

(B) is located primarily along the banks of the Comal River.

(b) A person described by Subsection (a) may be issued water park permits for not more than five premises:

(1) for which wine and malt beverage retailer's permits have been issued under Chapter 25; and

(2) that are located:

(A) in the public venue described in Subsection (a)(2); or

(B) not more than one mile from the boundary of that venue.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 32 (S.B. 1176), Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 161, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 56.04. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of this code applicable to a wine and malt beverage retailer's permit apply to a water park permit.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 32 (S.B. 1176), Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 162, eff. September 1, 2021.